sv: Typ av tårta: Änglakaka; Födelsedag; Kranskaka; Morot; Cheesecake; Choklad; Kaffe; Fruktkaka; Lagerkaka; Pound cake; Red velvet; Långpanna; Sockerkaka; Upp och ner-kaka; Bröllop; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip de prăjitură: Angel food; De zi de naștere; Guguluf (Bundt); De morcovi; Cheesecake; De ciocolată; De cafea; Cu fructe confiate; Cu straturi; Pound cake; Red velvet; De tavă; Pandișpan; Răsturnat; De nuntă; Altele
da: Kagetype: Angel food; Fødselsdag; Randkage; Gulerod; Cheesecake; Chokolade; Kaffe; Frugtkage; Lagkage; Sandkage; Red velvet; Bradepandekage; Sukkerbrødskage; Upside-down-kage; Bryllup; Andet
lt-LT: Pyrago tipas: Biskvitinis „Angel food“; Gimtadienio; Keksas; Morkų; Sūrio; Šokoladinis; Kavos; Vaisinis; Sluoksniuotas; Sviestinis „Pound“; Raudonojo aksomo; Plokščias; Biskvitinis; Apverstas; Vestuvinis; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta torte: Angelska torta; Rojstnodnevna; Šarkelj; Korenčkova; Cheesecake; Čokoladna; Kavna; Sadna; Večplastna; Masleni kolač; Red velvet; Iz pekača; Biskvitna; Obrnjena; Poročna; Drugo
vi: Loại bánh ngọt: Bánh xốp Angel food; Bánh sinh nhật; Bánh vòng (Bundt); Bánh cà rốt; Bánh phô mai; Sô-cô-la; Cà phê; Bánh trái cây; Bánh nhiều lớp; Bánh Pound; Bánh Red velvet; Bánh khay; Bánh bông lan; Bánh lật ngược; Bánh cưới; Khác
zh-CN: 蛋糕类型: 天使蛋糕; 生日蛋糕; 咕咕霍夫蛋糕; 胡萝卜蛋糕; 芝士蛋糕; 巧克力蛋糕; 咖啡蛋糕; 水果蛋糕; 夹层蛋糕; 磅蛋糕; 红丝绒蛋糕; 盘烤蛋糕; 海绵蛋糕; 翻转蛋糕; 婚礼蛋糕; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta torte: Kolač anđeoska hrana; Rođendanska; Kuglof; Od mrkve; Torta od sira; Čokoladna; S kavom; Voćni kolač; Slojevita torta; Pound; Red velvet; Ravni kolač; Biskvit; Preokrenuti kolač; Svadbena torta; Ostalo
it: Tipo di torta: Angel food cake; Di compleanno; Ciambella / Bundt; Di carote; Cheesecake; Al cioccolato; Al caffè; Torta di frutta; A strati; Quattro quarti / Pound cake; Red velvet; In teglia; Pan di Spagna; Rovesciata; Nuziale; Altro
tr: Pasta türü: Melek keki; Doğum günü; Ortası delik; Havuçlu; Cheesecake; Çikolatalı; Kahveli; Meyveli kek; Katlı; Pound kek; Kırmızı kadife; Tepsi; Pandispanya; Tersyüz; Düğün; Diğer
pl: Rodzaj ciasta: Anielskie (Angel food); Urodzinowe; Babka; Marchewkowe; Sernik; Czekoladowe; Kawowe; Keks; Warstwowe; Ciasto piaskowe; Red velvet; Z blachy; Biszkopt; Odwrócone (upside-down); Weselne; Inne
zh-TW: 蛋糕種類: 天使蛋糕; 生日蛋糕; 邦特蛋糕; 胡蘿蔔蛋糕; 起司蛋糕; 巧克力蛋糕; 咖啡蛋糕; 水果蛋糕; 分層蛋糕; 磅蛋糕; 紅絲絨蛋糕; 平板蛋糕; 海綿蛋糕; 翻轉蛋糕; 結婚蛋糕; 其他
hu: Torta típusa: Angyaltorta; Születésnapi; Kuglóf; Répatorta; Sajttorta; Csokoládé; Kávés; Gyümölcstorta; Réteges; Kevert tésztás; Vörös bársony (Red velvet); Tepsis; Piskóta; Fordított (Upside-down); Esküvői; Egyéb
cs: Druh dortu: Andělský dort; Narozeninový dort; Bábovka; Mrkvový dort; Cheesecake; Čokoládový dort; Ke kávě; Ovocný dort; Vrstvený dort; Třená bábovka (pound cake); Red velvet; Na plech; Piškotový dort; Obrácený dort; Svatební dort; Jiný
pt-BR: Tipo de bolo: Angel food; Aniversário; Bundt; Cenoura; Cheesecake; Chocolate; Café; Bolo de frutas; Camadas; Amanteigado (pound cake); Red velvet; Tabuleiro; Pão de ló; Invertido; Casamento; Outro
de: Kuchenart: Angel Food; Geburtstag; Gugelhupf; Karotte; Käsekuchen; Schokolade; Kaffee; Früchtekuchen; Schichtkuchen; Rührkuchen; Red Velvet; Blechkuchen; Biskuit; Gestürzt; Hochzeit; Sonstige
es: Tipo de pastel: Pastel de ángel; Cumpleaños; Bundt; Zanahoria; Pastel de queso; Chocolate; Café; Pastel de frutas; En capas; Panqué; Terciopelo rojo; En plancha; Bizcocho esponjoso; Invertido; Boda; Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de bolo: Angel food; Aniversário; Bundt; Cenoura; Cheesecake; Chocolate; Café; Bolo de frutas; Camadas; Pound; Red velvet; Tabuleiro; Pão de ló; Invertido; Casamento; Outro
fr: Type de gâteau: Gâteau des anges; Anniversaire; Kouglof; Carotte; Cheesecake; Chocolat; Café; Gâteau aux fruits; À étages; Quatre-quarts; Red velvet; Sur plaque; Génoise; Renversé; Mariage; Autre
en: Cake type: Angel food; Birthday; Bundt; Carrot; Cheesecake; Chocolate; Coffee; Fruitcake; Layer; Pound; Red velvet; Sheet; Sponge; Upside-down; Wedding; Other
nb: Kaketype: Englekake; Bursdagskake; Formkake; Gulrotkake; Ostekake; Sjokoladekake; Kaffekake; Fruktkake; Lagkake; Pundkake; Red velvet; Langpannekake; Sukkerbrød; Opp-ned-kake; Bryllupskake; Annet
ru: Тип торта: Ангельский бисквит; Именинный; Кекс с отверстием (Bundt); Морковный; Чизкейк; Шоколадный; Кофейный; Фруктовый кекс; Многослойный торт; Фунтовый кекс; Красный бархат; Пластовой торт; Бисквит; Перевернутый пирог; Свадебный; Другое
sk-SK: Typ koláča: Anjelská torta; Narodeninová; Bábovka; Mrkvová; Cheesecake; Čokoládová; Kávová; Ovocná; Poschodová; Z treného cesta; Red velvet; Z plechu; Piškótová; Obrátená; Svadobná; Iné
el: Τύπος κέικ: Κέικ των αγγέλων; Γενεθλίων; Bundt; Καρότου; Cheesecake; Σοκολάτας; Καφέ; Κέικ φρούτων; Με στρώσεις; Κέικ βουτύρου (pound); Red velvet; Επίπεδο; Παντεσπάνι; Αναποδογυριστό; Γάμου; Άλλο
th: ประเภทเค้ก: แองเจิลฟู้ด; เค้กวันเกิด; เค้กบันต์; เค้กแครอท; ชีสเค้ก; เค้กช็อกโกแลต; เค้กกาแฟ; ฟรุตเค้ก; เค้กเลเยอร์; พาวนด์เค้ก; เรดเวลเวต; เค้กถาด; สปันจ์เค้ก; อัปไซด์ดาวน์เค้ก; เค้กแต่งงาน; อื่นๆ
ja: ケーキタイプ: エンゼルフード; バースデー; バント; キャロット; チーズケーキ; チョコレート; コーヒー; フルーツケーキ; レイヤー; パウンド; レッドベルベット; シート; スポンジ; アップサイドダウン; ウェディング; その他
bg-BG: Вид торта: Ангелски кекс; За рожден ден; Кекс (Bundt); Морковен; Чийзкейк; Шоколадов; Кафе; Плодов; На пластове; Паунд кекс (Pound); Червено кадифе; Плоска торта (Sheet); Пандишпан; Обърнат; Сватбен; Други
nl: Soort cake: Angel food; Verjaardag; Tulband; Wortel; Cheesecake; Chocolade; Koffie; Vruchtencake; Laagjes; Poundcake; Red velvet; Plaat; Biscuit; Ondersteboven; Bruiloft; Overig
ko: 케이크 종류: 엔젤 푸드; 생일; 번트; 당근; 치즈케이크; 초콜릿; 커피; 과일 케이크; 레이어; 파운드; 레드 벨벳; 시트; 스펀지; 업사이드 다운; 웨딩; 기타
fi: Kakun tyyppi: Enkelikakku; Syntymäpäiväkakku; Kuivakakku; Porkkanakakku; Juustokakku; Suklaakakku; Kahvikakku; Hedelmäkakku; Täytekakku; Sokerikakku; Red velvet -kakku; Levykakku; Sokerikakku; Keikauskakku; Hääkakku; Muu